Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 18.1 Nongame Wildlife Fund

20-18.1-1.
Declaration of intent.

Whereas the state of Rhode Island recognizes that a diversified, stable, clean, and aesthetically satisfying natural environment is essential to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of Rhode Island; and

Whereas such an environment contributes significantly to economic and social development and progress and is also of high value for educational, scientific, recreational, and other purposes; and

Whereas it is further recognized that the continued existence of this natural environment within Rhode Island is dependent upon the maintenance of a high order of diversity of life forms within that environment and is equally dependent upon the maintenance of sufficient and suitable natural habitat in which a diverse fauna and flora can reproduce, find food, shelter, and clean soil, water, and air and carry out those functions essential to sustain their existences; and

Whereas it is recognized that in addition to appropriate habitat, diversity and numbers of species and individuals in native faunal and floral populations is the key to maintaining a healthy, stable, and productive natural environment within which the citizens of Rhode Island can function; and

Whereas it is acknowledged that Rhode Island has a distinctive natural community of living things worthy of protection for its own sake and for the use and benefits of its people; and

Whereas it is further recognized that the existence of many individual species of animals and plants within Rhode Island has been, and may continue to be, threatened by the intentional and unintentional activities of humans in the course of their daily affairs:

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the state of Rhode Island, to provide a means by which “nongame wildlife” research and management may be financed through a voluntary checkoff of a portion of an income tax refund owed to a taxpayer by the state. It is also intended that funds generated by the checkoff be supplemental to any funds that would otherwise be available for the above purposes, and that the funds be used only for “nongame wildlife” research and management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 437, § 1.

20-18.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following terms shall, where the context permits, be construed as follows:

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management, or any subordinate, or subordinates, to whom the director has delegated the powers and duties vested in him or her by this chapter.

“Nongame wildlife” means, generally, any member of the animal kingdom that is a species that is neither harvested or domesticated by humans in Rhode Island. It also means any member of the plant kingdom that grows in this state in a wild or unmanaged situation without cultivation, fertilization, or other agricultural practice required to sustain it. The director, in addition to his or her other powers, has the power to promulgate lists of the names of specific animals and plants that are excluded from the category of nongame wildlife, in accordance with these criteria.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 437, § 1.

20-18.1-3.
Nongame wildlife — Uses of the fund.

Sums collected as a result of the taxpayer checkoff as provided for in §

44-30-2.2

shall be deposited as general revenues. The director is authorized to accept any grant, devise, bequest, donation, gift, or assignment of money, bonds, or other valuable securities for deposit as general revenues.

The moneys appropriated under this chapter are to be used solely to research, manage, protect, inventory, and establish a body of ecological information pertaining to nongame wildlife species. When appropriate, these uses may include habitat acquisition; educational programs; personnel needs; enforcement of laws pertaining specifically to nongame wildlife; planning, writing, and implementation of management programs; utilization of funds from other sources; and cooperation with other public and private programs with similar or parallel objectives. The moneys shall not be used for animal control programs, nor for any program or activity related directly to game or domestic animals.

Moneys deposited may be carried over from one fiscal year to the next.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 55.